src-fst-moh-root.lexc.md
INTRODUCTION TO MORPHOLOGICAL ANALYSER OF Mohawk LANGUAGE.



first attempt to model simplest form of mohawk verbs:
personal prefix + root
https://giellalt.uit.no/lang/common/MorphologicalTags.html
extra tages are listed below

# Multichar_Symbols definitions
I-> X
you-> X
he -> X
she/smb/they -> X
it -> X
you and I -> X
smb and I -> X
you two -> X
two males or mixed -> X
two females -> X
you all and I -> X
they all and I -> X
you all
they all (male or mixed) -> X
they all (female) -> X
X -> I
X -> you
X -> he 
X -> she/smb/they 
X -> it 
X -> you and I
X -> smb and I 
X -> you two 
X -> two males or mixed 
X -> two females
X -> you all and I 
X -> they all and I 
X -> you all
X -> they all (male or mixed) 
X -> they all (female) 
Active voice, Red verbs
Passive voice, Blue verbs
Transitive verbs, Purple verbs


boundary of the root morpheme (arrow point to the start); 
personal prefix boundary (arrow point to the start)


The word forms in UNDEFINED language start from the lexeme roots of basic
word classes, or optionally from prefixes:

* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/moh-root.lexc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-moh/blob/main/../src/fst/moh-root.lexc)</small>
